Kentucky statutes. TITLE XV Roads, Waterways, And Aviation
Highways

177.020.
State primary roads to be designated and controlled by the Department of Highways — Notice to fiscal court and affected citizens — Rural secondary road system — Maintenance — Administrative regulations.

The state primary road system shall consist of such public roads and city streets within the state as the Department of Highways determines shall be established, constructed, or maintained by the Department of Highways.

The department shall, in its discretion, determine which public roads, or city streets, shall be established, constructed, or maintained by it, and shall determine the type of construction or maintenance for that road or city street.

In the establishment of the state primary road system, the Department of Highways is authorized to select new routes, deviate from an existing route whenever it deems such deviation proper, eliminate from the state primary system roads or city streets which have been replaced as proper part of the system by the construction of a new facility or the selection of a new route. No permanent ingress or egress ramp of the state primary road system on fully controlled access facilities shall be closed, except for repairs, unless a public hearing is first held in the area to be affected by the closing. The Department of Highways shall, at least twenty (20) days before the hearing, advertise in a newspaper of general circulation in the area to be affected by the closing, the date, time, and place of the hearing.

Prior to the advertisement for bids on any highway construction project, the Department of Highways shall meet with the fiscal court in the jurisdiction of the construction project for the purpose of advising the fiscal court of any state road or road segment which the department may seek to eliminate from the state primary road system upon completion of that highway construction project. The requirement of this subsection shall be in addition to the requirements of subsection (5) of this section.

The department shall notify the fiscal court of the county at least four (4) months before it eliminates a road, road segment, bridge, or street in that county from the state primary road system. Upon receiving notice, the fiscal court may reject title and notify the department that the road shall not become part of the county road system. If the fiscal court declines, the department shall give notice to all private persons entitled to a necessary access over this road of their rights under this chapter; and, by petition of any private party entitled to such access, the road shall be deemed a discontinued state road and shall be closed to public use but remain open in accordance with its condition and use for the access of the private parties involved. In the absence of such petition, title shall be transferred to the owner or owners of the tract or tracts of land to which the road originally belonged.

As used in this section, the term “rural secondary roads” shall mean the system of roads in this state which are usually considered farm-to-market roads and that are classified as part of the rural secondary road system by the Department of Highways. The roads in the rural secondary system shall be maintained with the proceeds of the provisions of KRS 177.320(1) and in no case shall the rural secondary system, as defined in this subsection, be less than eleven thousand eight hundred (11,800) miles.

The establishment, construction, or maintenance of the state primary road system shall be under the direction and control of the Department of Highways. The commissioner of highways is authorized to adopt regulations necessary to the administration of this authority.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 23, §§ 2, 3; 1972, ch. 242, § 1; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(1); 1980, ch. 243, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1986, ch. 174, § 18, effective July 15, 1986; 1992, ch. 80, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 2005, ch. 98, § 6, effective June 30, 2005; 2009, ch. 13, § 9, effective June 25, 2009.

177.021.
Department may acquire rights-of-way for primary system — Power of cities.

The Department of Highways is authorized to acquire and bear the cost of new or additional rights-of-way needed for establishment, improvement, construction, reconstruction, maintenance or repair of a public road or a city street which has been designated by the Department of Highways as a part of the state primary road system. All cities are authorized to deed any right-of-way owned by such cities to the Commonwealth of Kentucky if the right-of-way is to become part of the state primary road system.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 23, § 2.

177.025.
Removal of snow from certain state roads by county plows on order of county judge/executive.

The provisions of KRS

67.078

and

67.710

notwithstanding, a county judge/executive may order county plows to remove snow from any state road the plow must travel on to reach a county road to be cleared. The county judge/executive shall not be required to declare an emergency for him to order county plows to remove snow from state roads.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 374, § 1, effective July 15, 1994.

177.030.
Cost of construction to be borne by state — State may accept donations.

The cost of construction of the primary roads shall be borne entirely by the state, or by the state and federal government, where the roads are built in cooperation, and they shall be maintained entirely by the state, but any county, municipality or person may make donations to the state in aid of the construction or maintenance of any road. The state may accept any donation on the terms and conditions prescribed by the department.

History.

4356t-5.

177.035.
Cost of relocation of publicly and privately owned utility equipment and appliances to be borne by department — Conditions.

If the department determines that it is necessary for any fireplugs, pipes, mains, conduits, cables, wires, towers, poles, and other equipment and appliances, belonging to any municipality or a municipally owned utility, or any water district established pursuant to KRS Chapter 74, any water association established pursuant to KRS Chapter 273, any local school district, or any sanitation district established pursuant to KRS Chapter 220, to be removed or relocated on, along, over, or under a highway, in order to construct, reconstruct, relocate, or improve any highway, the municipality, municipally owned utility, water district, local school district, or the sanitation district shall relocate or remove them in accordance with the order of the department. The costs and expenses of relocation or removal required by this section, including the costs of installing facilities in a new location, and the cost of any lands, or any rights or interest in lands, and any other rights, acquired to accomplish the relocation or removal, shall be ascertained and paid by the department as a part of the cost of improving or constructing highways.

The term “utility” as used in subsections (3) to (5) of this section shall mean any utility not referenced in subsection (1) of this section, and the term shall mean any utility as defined in KRS

278.010

.

If a utility has facilities located within the public right-of-way pursuant to KRS

416.140

, the department may reimburse the utility the cost to relocate the utility’s facilities to a location either within or without the public right-of-way if the relocation is required due to a highway construction project, subject to the following conditions:

The utility shall be required to submit to the department for the department’s approval a plan for relocating the utility’s facilities. The plan shall include:

A proposal for the relocation, including plans and a cost estimate developed in accordance with department guidelines; and

A reasonable schedule of calendar days for completing the relocation that has been agreed to by the department. If, due to circumstances beyond the utility’s control, the utility or the department cannot meet the specified completion date included in the plan, the department may grant an extension to the utility for a time period agreed upon by both parties; and

The utility shall be required to have either:

Entered into a written agreement with the department to include the relocation of the facilities as part of the department’s construction contract. The utility may, with the approval of the department, perform a portion of the relocation work under this subparagraph with contractors or employees of the utility; or

Entered into a written agreement with the department for the utility to remove all of its facilities that conflict with the highway construction project, as determined by the department, prior to letting the construction contract. The utility may perform a portion or all of the relocation work under this subparagraph with contractors or employees of the utility.

A utility that enters into an agreement with the department under subsection (3)(b) of this section shall be required to complete the relocation work in compliance with the schedule included in the plan required to be submitted under subsection (3)(a) of this section. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply if the department fails to undertake the highway construction project within the time period specified in the agreement, and in this instance, the department shall be required to reimburse the utility any allowable cost the utility has incurred to relocate its facilities in compliance with the plan approved by the department.

The department shall reimburse a utility as authorized in subsection (3) of this section if the department is satisfied that the utility’s facilities have been relocated in conformance with the plan approved by the department. The utility shall have twelve (12) months from the completion date of the relocation, according to the schedule of calendar days, to submit a reimbursement request for relocation costs to the department.

The provisions of this section shall not amend or affect in any way the provisions of KRS

179.265

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 361, § 1; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(1); 1988, ch. 207, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 281, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; repealed, reenact., and amend. Acts 1994, ch. 112, § 1, effective March 29, 1994; 1994, ch. 279, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 2004, ch. 154, § 1, effective July 13, 2004.

177.037.
Community boundary signs — Commemorative boundary signs for city or unincorporated urban place.

The Department of Highways may install and maintain signs recognizing the boundary of a city, town, or community whether incorporated or unincorporated. These signs shall be installed regardless of whether the community has a post office, if the Department of Highways had previously erected signs recognizing the city, town, or community. The signs shall be placed at the official community boundaries. If the community does not have official boundaries, the signs shall be installed at the community boundaries as determined by the built-up area.

The department shall install and maintain signs at the boundaries of any city or an unincorporated urban place as defined in KRS

177.366

, regardless of whether the city or unincorporated urban place has a post office or zip code, if the city or unincorporated urban place:

Submits a written request for not more than two (2) signs:

To honor the birthplace of a person important to the city or unincorporated urban place; or

To honor an event or accomplishment important to the city or unincorporated urban place; and

Agrees to pay for the actual cost to make and install the signs.

The department shall work with the city or unincorporated urban place to determine the appropriate place to install the signs required under subsection (2) of this section. If an agreement cannot be reached on the appropriate place to install the signs, the site selected by the city or unincorporated urban place shall take precedence and the department shall not prohibit and shall not delay the installation of the signs.

Each city or unincorporated urban place requesting a sign under subsection (2) of this section shall be limited to two (2) signs. Requests for additional signs authorized under subsection (2) of this section in excess of two (2) by the same city or unincorporated urban place shall be consolidated into a single sign.

All statutes to the contrary notwithstanding, the Transportation Cabinet shall amend its policies and administrative regulations in effect on July 15, 2002, to comply with the provisions of this section, and shall not subsequently adopt new policies or promulgate new administrative regulations to the contrary.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 191, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 2002, ch. 298, § 2, effective July 15, 2002; 2014, ch. 92, § 248, effective January 1, 2015.

177.040.
Roads through cities of fifth or sixth class; cost of construction. [Repealed.]

177.041.
City streets constituting connecting links for state and Federal highways, maintenance by state. [Repealed.]

177.042.
Designation of city streets by commissioner of highways — Record — Statement to city.

The commissioner of highways on and after July 1, 1942, may designate such city streets or portions thereof, including viaducts and bridges, as in his discretion are connecting links of state or federal maintained highways or that he may in his discretion determine to be necessary feeder streets and necessary to produce an adequate system of highways. The Department of Highways shall prepare and cause a record of such city streets so designated and upon each such designation it shall furnish to each city a statement of the streets so designated in that city.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 30, § 2.

177.043.
Powers of department as to designated city streets — Agreements.

On and after July 1, 1942, the Department of Highways may maintain and repair, construct and reconstruct under its control and supervision such city streets so designated by the commissioner of highways, and may make appropriations and expenditures out of its fund for such purposes. The department may enter into any and all contracts inclusive of agreements with cities and with any federal agencies authorized so to do for such purpose.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 30, § 3; 1950, ch. 90, § 1.

177.044.
Type of construction; plans and specifications; grade; designation of department as agent of city. [Repealed.]

177.045.
Conveyance of rights of way to state; acquisition of additional rights of way. [Repealed.]

177.046.
Traffic regulations on streets; signs, markers and signals; penalties; limits on duties of highway department. [Repealed.]

177.047.
Permission of department required for obstructions or excavations in streets.

Any city or person who enters upon such designated city connecting link streets or rights of way thereof, for the purpose of laying conduits, pipes, poles or wires therein, thereon or thereunder or makes any obstruction thereon or any excavation thereunder, which necessitates any change in the condition or structure thereof, shall do so as provided by regulations prescribed by the Department of Highways. The Department of Highways may prescribe rules and regulations for the protection of city connecting link streets, under which such work shall be done, and require indemnity for any damage occasioned by work done under the regulations.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 30, § 7.

177.048.
Routing of highways through fourth, fifth or sixth-class city to reach first or second-class city. [Repealed.]

177.050.
Construction of roads with county funds — Repayment to county.

If any county desires to construct any part of a public road before the state is prepared to construct it, such county shall ask the department for permission to do so. When such request is made the department shall immediately investigate the request, and if they find that the county has funds available to construct such road and will pay for the construction thereof, the department may take up the construction of such road, as soon as the county has taken such steps as the department requires to make available subject to its order sufficient funds to pay for the construction of the road. When the county has satisfied these requirements, the department may proceed to construct the road in the same way and under the same regulations that it constructs other roads. The department shall keep careful account of the money advanced by the county to the state, and when the project of which the road is a part has been completed, the state shall refund to the county the money advanced upon proper certification of the department, if the road is to be accepted by the commissioner of highways as a part of the state primary road system.

History.

4356t-11: amend. Acts 1964, ch. 88, § 1.

177.055.
Construction and maintenance of urban roads and streets.

An incorporated area or unincorporated urban place may elect, with the concurrence of the Department of Highways, to construct, reconstruct, or maintain urban roads and streets which are included in the Department of Highways’ state primary road system and are maintained by the Department of Highways.

The Department of Highways cannot initiate the expenditures of funds allocated pursuant to KRS

177.365

on any roads or streets classified by the Department of Highways as being a part of the state primary road system as defined in KRS

177.020

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 67, § 1.

177.057.
Required consultation on highway access prior to purchase of property for school facility.

A local school district shall not purchase property for the construction of any school facility until the district consults with the Kentucky Transportation Cabinet, Department of Highways, Frankfort Office, to determine if the property to be purchased currently has adequate highway access or if highway access is planned for a future date by the Transportation Cabinet. If the property to be purchased does not currently have adequate highway access or if the Transportation Cabinet does not plan future highway access to the property, the cabinet shall so notify the local school district in writing.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 112, § 2, effective March 29, 1994.

177.060.
Payment for right-of-way.

Except as otherwise provided in this section and in KRS

177.070

, all cost of acquiring any necessary land or right-of-way for primary road purposes and all damages incurred shall be paid by the county.

Temporary rights-of-way and private surfaced roads, other than those owned by the county, which are acquired for primary road purposes shall be paid for by the state.

When a highway has been located by the department and a right-of-way procured by the county and accepted by the department, any additional right-of-way required by the department as a result of a change in the highway may be acquired by the department and shall be paid for by the state unless it is a road owned by the county.

The cost of acquiring right-of-way for initial construction of industrial access roads, state park access roads and other roads the construction of which would best serve the interests of the Commonwealth in promoting economic and industrial growth shall be paid by the state.

History.

4356t-7: amend. Acts 1962, ch. 163.

177.065.
Moving costs of residents of land taken, paid when. [Repealed.]

177.066.
Financial assistance for persons displaced by highway acquisition. [Repealed.]

177.068.
Statutorily designated sections of the National Truck Network.

The United States Route 431 from the junction of the Wendell H. Ford Western Kentucky Parkway to the Kentucky and Tennessee border shall be designated as part of the National Truck Network established pursuant to the federal Surface Transportation Assistance Act of 1982.

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 216, § 1, effective July 12, 2006.

177.070.
Purchase of right-of-way — Donations.

Except as provided in subsection (2), the department may agree with any landowner as to the value of a right-of-way and if the agreement is approved by the county attorney the fiscal court shall enter an order directing the payment of the amount agreed upon to the landowner, and the agreement shall be entered upon the county court’s records.

The department may contract with the owners of private surfaced roads necessary to be incorporated in the primary road system, and agree upon the price to be paid, subject to the approval of the county judge/executive and county attorney in each county where such roads are located. Upon receipt of the certificate of the county judge/executive and county attorney showing the transfer and total cost, the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall draw its warrant upon the State Treasurer for payment of the amount certified. The state shall not pay for private roads owned by counties.

Any landowner may donate a right-of-way across his land for any primary road, by executing a deed to the department for the use and benefit of the state for such right-of-way.

History.

4356t-7.

177.072.
Motorcycle awareness signs.

As used in this section:

“Local government” means:

Any city organized and governed under KRS Chapter 83 or 83A;

Any urban-county government organized and governed under KRS Chapter 67A;

Any consolidated local government organized and governed under KRS Chapter 67C; and

All of Kentucky’s one hundred twenty (120) counties; and

“Motorcycle awareness signs” means signs that increase the awareness of the traveling public to the possible presence of motorcycles and which are erected in the highway right-of-way of any highway that is part of the state primary road system established under KRS

177.020

.

All statutes to the contrary notwithstanding, the cabinet shall permit any local government, subject to the provisions of subsection (4) of this section, to erect motorcycle awareness signs.

The cabinet may, in addition to authorizing a local government to erect motorcycle awareness signs, also erect motorcycle awareness signs.

Any local government wanting to erect motorcycle awareness signs shall submit a written request to the cabinet. The request shall identify the routes and the specific location on the routes where motorcycle awareness signs will be erected. If the cabinet determines that any location identified in the request would pose a traffic safety hazard, the cabinet shall identify an alternative location for the placement of the motorcycle awareness signs.

The signs authorized to be erected under this section shall consist of two (2) signs. The upper sign shall be diamond shaped with a motorcyclist pictured on the sign. A second rectangular sign shall be placed directly below the diamond shaped sign and contain the words “Share the Road.” The signs shall conform with the standards established in the “Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices” published by the United States Department of Transportation, Federal Highway Administration.

History.

Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 113, § 1, effective June 20, 2005.

177.073.
Official signs and notices as to scenic and historical attractions.

The Department of Highways shall erect within six hundred and sixty (660) feet of the right-of-way of any interstate, limited access highway, federal-aid primary highway, or turnpikes official directional signs and notices pertaining to publicly and privately owned natural wonders and scenic and historical attractions, including cultural, scientific, educational, and religious sites, and areas of natural scenic beauty or naturally suited for outdoor recreation deemed to be in the interest of the traveling public under the following conditions:

Such signs shall not violate any federal law, rule, or regulation, nor exceed any standards of size, lighting, spacing, and message content as may be promulgated from time to time by the secretary of the United States Department of Transportation under subsection (c) of Section 131 of Title 23 of the United States Code affecting the allocation of federal funds to the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

Such signs and notices shall not violate any safety standards set forth in KRS

177.830

to

177.890

nor any regulation promulgated by the commissioner of highways pursuant to KRS

177.860

.

The message content on such signs and notices shall be limited to the identification by name of the attraction or activity and directional information useful to the traveler in locating the attraction, such as mileage, route numbers, or exit numbers. Descriptive words or phrases, and pictorial or photographic representations of the activity or its environs are prohibited.

The commissioner of highways shall promulgate by regulations specific selection methods and criteria to be used in determining those sites and attractions, publicly and privately owned, for which directional signs and notices may be erected as permitted by subsection (c) of Section 131 of Title 23, United States Code. A statement as to selection methods, criteria, and standards of size, lighting, and spacing shall be furnished to the secretary of the United States Department of Transportation before the Department of Highways erects any such directional signs and notices. The commissioner shall consider and determine, upon proper application to the Department of Highways, those sites and attractions eligible for official directional signs and notices.

The Department of Highways shall require reimbursement for the cost of erection and maintenance of official directional signs and notices authorized by this section when such sites or attractions are privately owned and shall prescribe the size, number, and locations of such signs and notices based upon its determination of the traveler’s need for information.

The commissioner of highways shall promulgate such reasonable rules and regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 317, § 1.

177.0734.
Definitions for KRS 177.0734 and 177.0736.

As used in KRS

177.0734

and

177.0736

, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Fully controlled access highways” means highways, limited to interstate and state parkways, that shall give preference to through traffic, shall have access only at selected public roads or streets, shall have no highway grade crossing or intersection, and shall further conform with the Federal Highway Administration’s (FHWA’s) adopted standards as contained in Federal Highway Program Manual (FHPM) 6-8-3-8 and to administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A;

“Logo signs” means signs that consist of a business identification symbol, name, brand, trademark, or combination thereof that may be attached to specific service signs, pursuant to the Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices (MUTCD) and administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A;

“Specific service signs” means official signs, erected on the rights-of-ways of fully controlled or partially controlled access highways or roads as defined in KRS

177.010

, that shall include, but not be limited to, the display of the words “Gas”, “Food”, “Lodging”, “Attractions”, or “Camping” or combinations thereof and shall have space for one (1) or more logo signs that may be attached to the official signs. The erection and maintenance of the official signs shall conform with the Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices (MUTCD) and administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A; and

“Partially controlled access highway” means a highway that gives preference to through traffic, that has access only at selected public roads or streets, and that may have a limited number of highway at-grade intersections and private driveway connections.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 402, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 526, § 5, effective July 15, 1998.

177.0736.
Logo and service signs — Administrative regulations.

The commissioner of the Department of Highways shall promulgate administrative regulations, pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A, to provide for the erection of specific service signs on fully controlled access highways or at interchanges on partially controlled access highways. The administrative regulations shall conform to the Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices (MUTCD), and shall include, but not be limited to, criteria for the following:

Distances to eligible businesses;

Selection of eligible businesses;

Acceptance of logo signs that conform to the MUTCD;

Removing or covering logo signs during off seasons for eligible businesses operated on a seasonal basis;

Defining the circumstances in which specific service signs are erected; and

Determining the costs to eligible businesses for initial installation, annual maintenance, and removal of logo signs.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 402, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 90, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 526, § 6, effective July 15, 1998.

177.0738.
Logo signs for eligible businesses.

Any camping facility that has been authorized by the commissioner of the Department of Highways to attach its logo sign to the face of a specific service sign erected on a fully controlled access highway, pursuant to the Federal Highway Administration’s Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices, may make application to the commissioner of the Department of Highways to have its logo sign attached to the face of a specific service sign erected on any road as defined in KRS

177.010

.

The commissioner of the Department of Highways shall promulgate administrative regulations, pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A, to provide for the erection of specific service signs on roads, as defined in KRS

177.010

. The specific service signs as herein required to be erected shall include, but not be limited to, the display of logo signs that provide identification of and directional information to camping facilities. The administrative regulations shall conform with the Federal Highway Administration’s Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices (MUTCD) and shall include, but not be limited to, criteria for the following:

Selection of eligible businesses;

Distances to eligible businesses;

Acceptance of logo signs that conform to the MUTCD;

Removing or covering logo signs during off-seasons for eligible businesses operated on a seasonal basis;

Defining the circumstances in which specific service signs are erected; and

Determining the costs to eligible businesses for initial installation, annual maintenance, and removal of logo signs.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 426, § 1, effective July 14, 1992.

177.0739.
Bed and breakfast establishments, shopping malls, and shopping areas eligible to obtain specific service highway signs.

All statutes to the contrary notwithstanding, the Transportation Cabinet shall amend its policies and administrative regulations in effect on June 24, 2003, governing highway signage, to include bed and breakfast establishments, shopping malls, and shopping areas as businesses that are eligible to obtain a specific service highway sign, and shall not subsequently adopt new policies or promulgate new administrative regulations to the contrary.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 298, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2003, ch. 57, § 1, effective June 24, 2003.

177.074.
Naming of state road or bridge — Signage.

Every road which is part of the state primary system shall be identified by a specific route number. In addition to a route number, the secretary shall direct the placement of signage denoting the honorary naming of a bridge, a road, or a road segment to comply with the provisions of subsections (2), (3), and (5) of this section.

The secretary shall, within thirty (30) days of receipt of a written request by the commissioner of the Department of Kentucky State Police, name a state road or segment of a state road in memory and honor of Kentucky state troopers killed in the line of duty. The written request shall include the:

Trooper’s name;

Date and circumstances of the trooper’s death; and

Specific segment of state road the Department of Kentucky State Police is requesting be named in honor and memory of the state trooper killed in the line of duty.

The road or road segment identified in the request shall be either the state road where the trooper was killed, or the state road closest to the deceased trooper’s home. The cabinet shall consult with the commissioner of the Department of Kentucky State Police on the design and installation of the road signs naming the state road or road segment in honor and memory of each trooper, and the cabinet shall erect the appropriate highway signs within thirty (30) days of receipt of the written request required under subsection (2) of this section.

If the road segment identified in the request under subsection (2) of this section has already been named for another individual or organization, the Department of Kentucky State Police and the cabinet shall consult on and determine an alternate location that is acceptable to both agencies.

The secretary shall direct the placement of signage denoting the honorary naming of a road, a road segment, or a bridge upon direction by joint resolution of the General Assembly.

The placement of the signs installed as a result of a resolution passed by the General Assembly shall be the responsibility of the Department of Highways.

A school board or the governing body of a city or county may petition the secretary for the installation of temporary signage honoring an individual, a group of individuals, or a team.

The secretary shall, within thirty (30) days of receipt of a written request under this subsection, approve or deny the petition.

Within thirty (30) days of the approval of a petition, the secretary shall direct the placement of honorary signage under this subsection. The Transportation Cabinet shall be the final arbiter of the location of signage placement under this subsection. Signage installed under this subsection shall remain in place for a minimum of one (1) year from the date of its placement.

The petitioning body shall bear all costs of signage and installation under this subsection.

The Transportation Cabinet may adopt administrative regulations to implement the provisions of subsection (7) of this section, including but not limited to basic standards for design and placement of signs and establishing a process to allow the petitioning body to reimburse the Transportation Cabinet for the cost of manufacturing and installing the signs for which a petition has been granted.

The new proposed truck bypass around Mayfield, Kentucky, shall be named the “Dick Castleman Bypass,” after former State Representative Dick Castleman.

The bridge on United States Highway 27 over the Kentucky River near Camp Nelson, between Jessamine and Garrard Counties, shall be named the “Loyd Murphy Memorial Bridge.”

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 180, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1996, ch. 356, § 2, effective July 15, 1996; 2002, ch. 64, § 2, effective July 15, 2002; 2007, ch. 85, § 185, effective June 26, 2007; 2022 ch. 218, § 1, effective July 14, 2022.

177.0745.
Designation of Grange City Covered Bridge.

The Hillsboro Covered Bridge in Fleming County is renamed and designated the “Grange City Covered Bridge.”

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 404, § 2, effective July 15, 1998.

177.075.
Condemnation by Highway Department for roads and road materials. [Repealed.]

177.076.
Definitions for KRS 177.076 to 177.079.

As used in KRS

177.076

to

177.079

, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Historical site” means a cultural or educational site that is officially listed in the National Register of Historical Places;

“Fully controlled access highway” means a limited access highway, an interstate highway, and a parkway;

“Limited supplemental guide sign” means an official highway guide sign that is erected by the Department of Highways to give directions, furnish advance notice, show mileage or exit indicators, and indicate access to historical sites or to scenic, cultural, and recreational tourist areas or attractions and that conforms to the design standards and requirements set forth in the Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices (MUTCD);

“Post-interchange guide sign” means an official highway sign that may be used in conjunction with a limited supplemental guide sign and lists the name of a tourist area or attraction or an historical site and the distance from an interstate to a tourist area or attraction or an historical site. A post-interchange guide sign shall conform to the design standards and requirements set forth in the Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices (MUTCD);

“Rural area” means an area that does not have sufficient population to be designated as an urban area;

“Tourist area or attraction” means a cultural, recreational, or entertainment facility, family entertainment center, or an area of natural phenomenon or scenic beauty that is suited for outdoor recreation that receives a major portion of its income or visitors during the normal business season from motorists not residing in the immediate area of the tourist area or attraction. “Tourist area or attraction” does not include any of the following:

Lodging facilities; or

Facilities that are primarily devoted to the retail sale of goods, unless the facilities are a family entertainment center or the goods are created by individuals at the tourist area or attraction or if the sale of goods is incidental to the tourist area or attraction; or

Recreational facilities that do not serve as a likely destination where individuals who are not residents of the state would remain overnight in commercial lodging at or near the tourism area or attraction;

“Family entertainment center” means a facility, other than a stand alone shopping center, that meets all of the following criteria:

Contains a minimum of fifty thousand (50,000) square feet of building space;

Is located on property encompassing at least five (5) acres adjacent or complementary to a cultural, recreational, or entertainment facility, or natural recreational area;

Provides a variety of entertainment and leisure options;

Contains at least one (1) restaurant and at least two (2) additional venues, including, but not limited to, live entertainment, concert halls, museums, zoos, or other cultural, recreational or leisure activities; and

Is at a location where sixty percent (60%) of the developed property is devoted to entertainment and food options.

“City” means an area with a population of one hundred thousand (100,000) or more designated by the United States Department of Commerce, Bureau of the Census.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 526, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 353, § 1, effective July 14, 2000.